North Carolina statutes. Chapter 130A. Public Health.
Article 2. Local Administration.
§ 130A-69.
Procedure for extension of district.

If after a sanitary district has been created or the provisions of this Part have been made applicable to a sanitary district, a petition signed by not less than fifteen percent (15%) of the resident freeholders within any territory contiguous to and
adjoining the sanitary district may be presented to the sanitary district board requesting annexation of territory described in the petition. The sanitary district board shall send a copy of the petition to the board of commissioners
of the county or counties in which the district is located and to the Department. The sanitary district board shall request that the Department hold a joint public hearing with the sanitary district board on the question of annexation.
The Secretary and the chairperson of the sanitary district board shall name a time and place for the public hearing. The chairperson of the sanitary district board shall publish a notice of public hearing once in a newspaper or
newspapers published or circulating in the sanitary district and the territory proposed to be annexed. The notice shall be published not less than 15 days prior to the hearing. If after the hearing, the Commission approves the
annexation of the territory described in the petition, the Department shall advise the board or boards of commissioners of the approval. The board or boards of commissioners shall order and provide for the holding of a special
election in accordance with

G.S. 163-287

upon the question of annexation within the territory proposed to be annexed.

If at or prior to the public hearing, a petition is filed with the sanitary district board signed by not less than fifteen percent (15%) of the freeholders residing in the sanitary district requesting an election be held on the annexation question, the
sanitary district board shall send a copy of the petition to the board or boards of commissioners who shall order and provide for the submission of the question to the voters within the sanitary district. This election may be held
on the same day as the election in the territory proposed to be annexed, and both elections and registrations may be held pursuant to a single notice. A majority of the votes cast is necessary for a territory to be annexed to a
sanitary district.

The election shall be held by the county board or boards of elections in accordance with

G.S. 163-287

after the board or boards of commissioners orders the election. The cost of the election shall be paid by the sanitary district. Registration in the area proposed for annexation shall be under the same procedure
as

G.S. 163-288.2

.

Notice of the election shall be given as required by G.S. 163-33(8) and shall include a statement that the boundary lines of the territory to be annexed and the boundary lines of the sanitary district have been prepared by the district board and may be
examined. The notice shall also state that if a majority of the those voting in the election favor annexation, then the territory annexed shall be subject to all debts of the sanitary district.

The ballot shall be substantially as follows:

“• FOR annexation to the _______________ Sanitary District • AGAINST annexation to the _______________ Sanitary District.”

The board or boards of elections shall certify the results of the election to the sanitary district board and the board or boards of commissioners of the county or counties in which the district is located.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section, if a petition for extension of the boundaries of a sanitary district is signed by not less than fifty-one percent (51%) of the resident freeholders within the territory proposed to be annexed, it shall
not be necessary to hold an election provided for by this section on the question of the extension of the boundaries of the sanitary district.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section, if a petition for extension of the boundaries of a sanitary district is signed by the owners of all the real property within the territory proposed to be annexed, it shall not be necessary to hold
any election or any hearings provided for by this section on the question of the extension of the boundaries of the sanitary district.

No right of action or defense founded upon the invalidity of the election shall be asserted, nor shall the validity of the election be open to question in any court on any ground unless the action or proceeding is commenced within 30 days after the certification
of the results by the board or boards of elections.

When additional territory has been annexed to a sanitary district and the proposition of issuing bonds of the sanitary district after the annexation has been approved by the voters at an election held within one year subsequent to annexation, fifty-one
percent (51%) or more of the resident freeholders within the annexed territory may petition the sanitary district board for the removal and exclusion of the territory from the sanitary district. No petition may be filed after bonds
of the sanitary district have been approved in an election held at any time after annexation. If the sanitary district board approves the petition, it shall send a copy to the Department requesting that the petition be granted
and shall send additional copies to the county board or boards of commissioners. A public hearing shall be conducted under the same procedure provided for the annexation of additional territory. If the Commission deems it advisable
to comply with the request of the petition, the Commission shall adopt a resolution to that effect and shall redefine the boundaries of the sanitary district.

History.
1927, c. 100, s. 24; 1943, c. 543; 1947, c. 463, s. 1; 1951, c. 897, s. 1; 1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1959, c. 1189, s. 2; 1961, c. 732; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; 1981, c. 186, s. 5; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 2013-381, s. 10.20; 2017-6,
s. 3; 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), 6.1.

Re-recodification; Technical and Conforming Changes.

Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, provides, in part: “The Revisor of Statutes shall recodify Chapter 138A of the General Statutes, Chapter 120C of the General Statutes, as well as Chapter 163 of the General Statutes, as amended by this act, into a new Chapter
163A of the General Statutes to be entitled `Elections and Ethics Enforcement Act,’ as enacted by Section 4 of this act. The Revisor may also recodify into the new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes other existing statutory laws
relating to elections and ethics enforcement that are located elsewhere in the General Statutes as the Revisor deems appropriate.” The Revisor was further authorized to make additional technical and conforming changes to catchlines,
internal citations, and other references throughout the General Statutes to effectuate this recodification. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor of Statutes conformed changes to references in subsections (a), (c), and (d).

Session Laws 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), and 6.1 repealed Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, and authorized the Revisor of Statutes to re-recodify Chapter 163A into Chapters 163, 138A, and 120C and to revert the changes made by the Revisor pursuant to Session
Laws 2017-6, s. 3. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor of Statutes reverted the changes to references in subsections (a), (c), and (d).

§ 130A-70.
District and municipality extending boundaries and corporate limits simultaneously.

When the boundaries of a sanitary district lie entirely within or are coterminous with the corporate limits of a city or town and the sanitary district provides the only public water supply and sewage disposal system for the city or town, the boundaries
of the sanitary district and the corporate limits of the city or town may be extended simultaneously as provided in this section.

Twenty-five percent (25%) or more of the resident freeholders within the territory proposed to be annexed to the sanitary district and to the city or town may petition the sanitary district board and the governing board of the city or town setting forth
the boundaries of the area proposed to be annexed and the objects annexation is proposed to accomplish. The petition may also include any area already within the corporate limits of the city or town but not already within the boundaries
of the sanitary district. Upon receipt of the petition, the sanitary district board and the governing board of the city or town shall meet jointly and shall hold a public hearing prior to approval of the petition. Notice of the
hearing shall be made by posting a notice at the courthouse door of the county or counties and by publishing a notice at least once a week for four consecutive weeks in a newspaper with a circulation in the county or counties.
If at or after the public hearing the sanitary district board and the governing board of the city or town, acting jointly, shall each approve the petition, the petition shall be submitted to the Commission for approval. If the
Commission approves the petition, the question shall be submitted to a vote of all voters in the area or areas proposed to be annexed voting as a whole. The election shall be held on a date approved by the sanitary district board
and by the governing board of the city or town.

The words “For Extension” and “Against Extension” shall be printed on the ballots for the election. A majority of all the votes cast is necessary for a district and municipality to extend boundaries and corporate limits simultaneously.

After declaration of the extension, the territory and its citizens and property shall be subject to all debts, ordinances and rules in force in the sanitary district and in the city or town, and shall be entitled to the same privileges and benefits as
other parts of the sanitary district and the city or town. The newly annexed territory shall be subject to the sanitary district and the city or town taxes levied for the fiscal year following the date of annexation.

The costs of holding and conducting the election for annexation pursuant to this section, shall be shared equally by the sanitary district and by the city or town.

The sanitary district board and the governing board of the city or town acting jointly, may order the board or boards of elections of the county or counties in which the sanitary district and the city or town are located, to call, hold, conduct and certify
the result of the election, according to the provisions of Chapter 163 of the General Statutes.

When the boundaries of a sanitary district and the corporate limits of a city or town are extended as provided in this section, and the proposition of issuing bonds of the sanitary district as enlarged has not been approved by the voters at an election
held within one year subsequent to the extension, the annexed territory may be removed and excluded from the sanitary district in the manner provided in

G.S. 130A-69

. If the petition includes areas within the present corporate limits of the city or town but not within the present boundaries of the sanitary district, these areas shall not be removed or excluded from the city
or town under the provisions of this section.

The powers granted by this section shall be supplemental and additional to powers conferred by any other law and shall not be regarded as in derogation to any powers now existing.

History.
1953, c. 977; 1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; 1981, c. 186, s. 6; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), 6.1.

Re-recodification; Technical and Conforming Changes.

Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, provides, in part: “The Revisor of Statutes shall recodify Chapter 138A of the General Statutes, Chapter 120C of the General Statutes, as well as Chapter 163 of the General Statutes, as amended by this act, into a new Chapter
163A of the General Statutes to be entitled ‘Elections and Ethics Enforcement Act,’ as enacted by Section 4 of this act. The Revisor may also recodify into the new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes other existing statutory laws
relating to elections and ethics enforcement that are located elsewhere in the General Statutes as the Revisor deems appropriate.” The Revisor was further authorized to make additional technical and conforming changes to catchlines,
internal citations, and other references throughout the General Statutes to effectuate this recodification. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor of Statutes substituted “Subchapter III of Chapter 163A” for “Chapter 163” in subsection
(f).

Session Laws 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), and 6.1 repealed Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, and authorized the Revisor of Statutes to re-recodify Chapter 163A into Chapters 163, 138A, and 120C and to revert the changes made by the Revisor pursuant to Session
Laws 2017-6, s. 3. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor of Statutes reverted the changes to references in subsection (f).

§ 130A-70.1.
Satellite annexation in conjunction with municipal annexation in certain sanitary districts.

This section only applies to a sanitary district where one or more municipalities lie within its boundaries.

Whenever a municipality which lies within a sanitary district receives a petition for annexation under Part 4 of Article 4A of Chapter 160A of the General Statutes, the municipality may petition the sanitary district for that sanitary district to also
annex the same area. In such case, the sanitary district may, by resolution, annex the same area, but the annexation shall only become effective if the territory is annexed by the requesting municipality.

If

G.S. 160A-58.5

allows the municipality to fix and enforce schedules of rents, rates, fees, charges, and penalties in excess of those fixed and enforced within the primary corporate limits, the sanitary district may do likewise
as if

G.S. 160A-58.5

applied to it.

If the annexed area contains utility lines constructed or operated by the county and the sanitary district is to assume control, operation, or management of those lines, the sanitary district and county may by contract agree for the sanitary district
to assume the pro rata or otherwise mutually agreeable portion of indebtedness incurred by the county for such purpose, or to contractually agree with the county to reimburse the county for any debt service.

History.
2001-301, s. 1.

§ 130A-71.
Procedure for withdrawing from district.

Fifty-one percent (51%) or more of the resident freeholders of a portion of a sanitary district which has no outstanding indebtedness, with the approval of the sanitary district board, may petition the county board of commissioners of the county in which
a major portion of the petitioners reside, that the identified portion of the district be removed and excluded from the district. If the county board of commissioners approves the petition, an election shall be held in the entire district
on the question of exclusion. A majority of all the votes cast is necessary for a district to be removed and excluded from a sanitary district. The county board of commissioners shall notify the Commission who shall remove and exclude
the portion of the district, and redefine the limits accordingly.

History.
1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; 1983, c. 891, s. 2.

§ 130A-72.
Dissolution of certain sanitary districts.

Fifty-one percent (51%) or more of the resident freeholders of a sanitary district which has no outstanding indebtedness may petition the board of commissioners of the county in which all or the greater portion of the resident freeholders of the district
are located to dissolve the district. Upon receipt of the petition, the county board of commissioners shall notify the Department and the chairperson of the county board of commissioners of any other county or counties in which any
portion of the district lies, of the receipt of the petition, and shall request that the Department hold a joint public hearing with the county commissioners concerning the dissolution of the district. The Secretary and the chairperson
of the county board of commissioners shall name a time and place within the district for the public hearing. The county board of commissioners shall give prior notice of the hearing by posting a notice at the courthouse door of the
county or counties and by publication in a newspaper or newspapers with circulation in the county or counties at least once a week for four consecutive weeks. If all matters pertaining to the dissolution of the sanitary district cannot
be concluded at the hearing, the hearing may be continued to a time and place determined by the Department. If after the hearing, the Commission and the county board or boards of commissioners deem it advisable to comply with the request
of the petition, the Commission shall adopt a resolution to dissolve the sanitary district. The sanitary district board of the dissolved district is authorized to convey all assets, including cash, to any county, municipality, or other
governmental unit, or to any public utility company operating or to be operated under the authority of a certificate of public convenience and necessity granted by the North Carolina Utilities Commission in return for the assumption
of the obligation to provide water and sewage services to the area served by the district at the time of dissolution.

History.
1943, c. 620; 1951, c. 178, s. 2; 1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1967, c. 4, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; 1983, c. 891, s. 2.

§ 130A-73.
Dissolution of sanitary districts having no outstanding indebtedness and located wholly within or coterminous with corporate limits of city or town.

When the boundaries of a sanitary district which has no outstanding indebtedness are entirely located within or coterminous with the corporate limits of a city or town, fifty-one percent (51%) or more of the resident freeholders within the district may
petition the board of commissioners within the county in which all or the greater portion of the resident freeholders of the district are located to dissolve the district. Upon receipt of the petition, the board of commissioners shall
notify the Department, the chairperson of the board of commissioners of any other county or counties in which any portion of the district lies and the governing body of the city or town within which the district lies of the receipt
of the petition, and shall request that the Department hold a joint public hearing with the board or boards of commissioners and the governing body of the city or town. The Secretary, the chairperson of the board of commissioners of
the county in which all or the greater portion of the resident freeholders are located and the presiding officer of the governing body of the city or town shall name a time and place within the boundaries of the district and the city
or town for the public hearing. The county board of commissioners shall give notice of the hearing by posting prior notice at the courthouse door of the county or counties and also by publication in a newspaper or newspapers circulating
in the district at least once a week for four consecutive weeks. If all matters pertaining to the dissolution of the sanitary district cannot be concluded at the hearing, the hearing may be continued to a time and place determined
by the Department. If, after the hearing, the Commission, the county board or boards of commissioners and the governing body of the city or town shall deem it advisable to comply with the request of the petition, the Commission shall
adopt a resolution dissolving the district. All taxes levied by the sanitary district which were levied prior to but which are collected after the dissolution shall vest in the city or town. All property held, owned, controlled or
used by the sanitary district upon the dissolution or which may later be vested in the sanitary district, and all judgments, liens, rights and causes of actions in favor of the sanitary district shall vest in the city or town. At the
dissolution, taxes owed to the sanitary district shall be collected by the city or town.

History.
1963, c. 512, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; 1983, c. 891, s. 2.

§ 130A-73.1.
Dissolution of sanitary districts having no outstanding indebtedness and located wholly within or coterminous with corporate limits of city or town.

When the boundaries of a sanitary district that (i) is located entirely within one county, (ii) has no outstanding indebtedness, (iii) at the time of its creation was not located entirely within or coterminous with the corporate limits of a city or town,
(iv) has not provided any water or sewer service for at least five years, (v) did not levy any ad valorem tax in the current year, (vi) has been for at least five years entirely located within or coterminous with the corporate
limits of a city or town, and (vii) at the time of the annexation of the area of the district by that city or town, the city or town assumed all assets and liabilities of the district, the board of that district by unanimous vote
may petition the board of commissioners of the county in which the district is located to dissolve the district. Upon receipt of the petition, the board of commissioners shall notify the Department and the governing body of the
city or town within which the district lies of the receipt of the petition. If the Commission, the county board of commissioners, and the governing body of the city or town shall deem it advisable to comply with the request of
the petition, the Commission shall adopt a resolution dissolving the district. All taxes levied by the sanitary district that were levied prior to, but that are collected after, the dissolution shall vest in the city or town. All
property held, owned, controlled, or used by the sanitary district upon the dissolution or that may later be vested in the sanitary district, and all judgments, liens, rights, and causes of actions in favor of the sanitary district
shall vest in the city or town. At the dissolution, taxes owed to the sanitary district shall be collected by the city or town.

The procedure for the dissolution of a sanitary district set out in this section is an alternative to the procedure set out in

G.S. 130A-73

and any sanitary district to which both that section and this section apply may be dissolved under either section.

History.
1998-123, s. 1.

§ 130A-74.
Validation of creation of districts.

All actions prior to June 6, 1961, taken by the county boards of commissioners[,] by the State Board of Health, by any officer or by any other agency, board or officer of the State in the formation and creation of sanitary districts in the State, and
the formation and creation, or the attempted formation and creation of any sanitary districts are in all respects validated. These sanitary districts are declared lawfully formed and created and in all respects legal and valid sanitary
districts.

History.
1953, c. 596, s. 1; 1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1961, c. 667, s. 1; 1983, c. 891, s. 2.

§ 130A-75.
Validation of extension of boundaries of districts.

All actions prior to April 1, 1957, taken by the State Board of Health, a county board of commissioners, and a sanitary district board for the purpose of extending the boundaries of a sanitary district where the territory which was annexed contained no
resident freeholders, and where the owner or owners of the real property annexed requested of the sanitary district board that the territory be annexed to the sanitary district, are validated, notwithstanding any lack of power
to perform these acts or proceedings, and notwithstanding any defect or irregularity in the acts or proceedings.

All actions and proceedings prior to April 1, 1979, taken by the State Board of Health, the Commission, a board of county commissioners and a sanitary district board for the purpose of annexing additional territory to a sanitary district or with respect
to the annexation are validated notwithstanding any lack of power to perform these acts or proceedings or any defect or irregularity in any acts or proceedings; these sanitary districts are lawfully extended to include this additional
territory.

History.
1959, c. 415, s. 2; 1975, c. 712, s. 1; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1079, s. 1; 1983, c. 891, s. 2.

§ 130A-76.
Validation of dissolution of districts.

All actions prior to January 1, 1981, taken by a county board of commissioners, by the State Board of Health or Commission, by an officer or by any other agency, board or officer of the State in the dissolution of a sanitary district and the dissolution
or attempted dissolution of a sanitary district are validated.

History.
1953, c. 596, s. 2; 1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1981, c. 20, ss. 1, 2; 1983, c. 891, s. 2.

§ 130A-77.
Validation of bonds of districts.

All actions and proceedings prior to April 1, 1979, taken, and all elections held in a sanitary district or in a district purporting to be a legal sanitary district by virtue of the purported authority and acts of a county board of commissioners, State
Board of Health, Commission, or any other board, officer or agency for the purpose of authorizing, selling or issuing the bonds of the sanitary district, and all bonds at any time issued by or on behalf of a sanitary district, are
in all respects validated. These bonds are declared to be the legal and binding obligations of the sanitary district.

History.
1953, c. 596, s. 3; 1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1079, s. 2; 1983, c. 891, s. 2.

§ 130A-78.
Tax levy for validated bonds.

Sanitary districts are authorized to make appropriations and to levy annually a tax on property having a situs in the district under the rules and according to the procedure prescribed in the Machinery Act for the purpose of paying the principal of and
interest on bonds validated in

G.S. 130A-77

. The tax shall be sufficient for this purpose and shall be in addition to all other taxes which may be levied upon the taxable property in the sanitary district.

History.
1945, c. 89, s. 3; 1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1973, c. 803, s. 17; 1983, c. 891, s. 2.

§ 130A-79.
Validation of appointment or election of members of district boards.

All actions and proceedings prior to June 6, 1961, taken in the appointment or election of members of a sanitary district board are validated. Members of these boards shall have all the powers and may perform all the duties required or permitted of them
to be pursuant to this Part.

All actions and proceedings prior to May 1, 1959, taken in the appointment or election of members of a sanitary district board and the appointment or election of members are validated. Members of these boards shall have all the powers and may perform
all the duties required or permitted of them pursuant to the provisions of this Part.

History.
1953, c. 596, s. 4; 1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1959, c. 415, s. 1; 1961, c. 667, s. 2; 1983, c. 891, s. 2.

§ 130A-80.
Merger of district with contiguous city or town; election.

A sanitary district may merge with a contiguous city or town in the following manner:

The sanitary district board and the governing board of the city or town may resolve that it is advisable to call an election within both the sanitary district and the city or town to determine if the sanitary district and the city or town should merge;

If the sanitary district board and the governing board of the city or town resolve that it is advisable to call for an election, both boards shall adopt a resolution requesting the board of commissioners in the county or counties in which the district
and the town or city or any portion is located to hold an election on a date named by the sanitary district board and the governing board of the city or town after consultation with the appropriate board or boards of elections.
The election shall be held within the sanitary district and the city or town on the question of merger;

The county board or boards of commissioners shall request the appropriate board or boards of elections to hold and conduct the election. All voters of the city or town and the sanitary district shall be eligible to vote if the election is called in both
areas as authorized in subsection (1);

Notice of the election shall be given as required in G.S. 163-33(8). The board or boards of elections may use either method of registration set out in

G.S. 163-288.2

;

If an election is called as provided in subsection (2), the board or boards of elections shall provide ballots for the election in substantially the following form:

“• FOR merger of the Town of _______________ and the _______________ Sanitary District, if a majority of the registered voters of both the Sanitary District and the Town vote in favor of merger, the combined territories to be known as the Town of _______________
and to assume all of the obligations of the Sanitary District and to receive from the Sanitary District all the property rights of the District; from and after merger residents of the District would enjoy all of the benefits
of the municipality and would assume their proportionate share of the obligations of the Town as merged.

• AGAINST merger.”

A majority of all the votes cast by voters of the sanitary district and a majority of all the votes cast by voters of the city or town is necessary for the merger of a sanitary district with the city or town. The merger shall be effective on July 1 following
the election. If a majority of the votes cast in either the sanitary district or the city or town vote against the merger, any election on similar propositions of merger may not occur until one year from the date of the last election.

Upon the merger of a sanitary district and a city or town pursuant to this section, the city or town shall assume all obligations of the sanitary district and the sanitary district shall convey all property rights to the city or town. The vote for merger
shall include a vote for the city or town to assume the obligations of the district. The sanitary district shall cease to exist as a political subdivision from and after the effective date of the merger. After the merger, the residents
of the sanitary district enjoy all of the benefits of the municipality and shall assume their share of the obligations of the city or town. All taxes levied and collected by the city or town from and after the effective date of
the merger shall be levied and collected uniformly in all the territory included in the enlarged municipality; and

If merger is approved, the governing board of the city or town shall determine the proportion of the district’s indebtedness, if any, which was incurred for the construction of water systems and the proportion which was incurred for construction of sewage
disposal systems. The governing board shall send a certified copy of the determination to the local government commission in order that the Commission and the governing body of the merged municipality can determine the net debt
of the merged municipality as required by

G.S. 159-55

.

History.
1961, c. 866; 1981, c. 186, s. 7; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1987, c. 314, s. 1; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), 6.1.

Re-recodification; Technical and Conforming Changes.

Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, provides, in part: “The Revisor of Statutes shall recodify Chapter 138A of the General Statutes, Chapter 120C of the General Statutes, as well as Chapter 163 of the General Statutes, as amended by this act, into a new Chapter
163A of the General Statutes to be entitled ‘Elections and Ethics Enforcement Act,’ as enacted by Section 4 of this act. The Revisor may also recodify into the new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes other existing statutory laws
relating to elections and ethics enforcement that are located elsewhere in the General Statutes as the Revisor deems appropriate.” The Revisor was further authorized to make additional technical and conforming changes to catchlines,
internal citations, and other references throughout the General Statutes to effectuate this recodification. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor of Statutes conformed references in subdivision (4).

Session Laws 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), and 6.1 repealed Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, and authorized the Revisor of Statutes to re-recodify Chapter 163A into Chapters 163, 138A, and 120C and to revert the changes made by the Revisor pursuant to Session
Laws 2017-6, s. 3. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor of Statutes reverted the changes to references in subdivision (4).

OPINIONS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL

In an election held pursuant to former G.S. 130-156.2 for the merger of a municipality and a sanitary district, the results of the election would be determined by a majority of the registered voters of both the sanitary district and the municipality involved
who actually voted in the election. See opinion of the Attorney General to Mr. Archie L. Smith, Asheboro City Attorney, 40 N.C. Op. Att'y Gen. 641 (1969).

§ 130A-80.1.
Merger of district with coterminous city or town; election.

A sanitary district may merge with a coterminous city or town in the following manner:

The sanitary district board and the governing board of the city or town may resolve that it is advisable to call an election within the area of the sanitary district and the city or town to determine if the sanitary district and the city or town should
merge;

If the sanitary district board and the governing board of the city or town resolve that it is advisable to call for an election, both boards shall adopt a resolution requesting the board of commissioners in the county or counties in which the district
and the town or city or any portion is located to hold an election on a date named by the sanitary district board and the governing board of the city or town after consultation with the appropriate board or boards of elections.
The election shall be held within the sanitary district and the city or town on the question of merger;

The county board or boards of commissioners shall request the appropriate board or boards of elections to hold and conduct the election. All voters of the city or town and the sanitary district shall be eligible to vote;

Notice of the election shall be given as required in G.S. 163-33(8);

The board or boards of elections shall provide ballots for the election in substantially the following form:

“• FOR merger of the Town of _______________ and the _______________ Sanitary District, if a majority of the registered voters vote in favor of merger, the area to be known as the Town of _______________ and to assume all of the obligations of the Sanitary
District and to receive from the Sanitary District all the property rights of the District.

• AGAINST merger.”

A majority of all the votes cast is necessary for the merger of a sanitary district with the city or town. The merger shall be effective on July 1 following the election. If a majority of the votes cast is not in favor of the merger, an election on merger
may not occur until one year from the date of the last election.

Upon the merger of a sanitary district and a city or town pursuant to this section, the city or town shall assume all obligations of the sanitary district and the sanitary district shall convey all property rights to the city or town. The vote for merger
shall include a vote for the city or town to assume the obligations of the district. The sanitary district shall cease to exist as a political subdivision from and after the effective date of the merger; and

If merger is approved, the governing board of the city or town shall determine the proportion of the district’s indebtedness, if any, which was incurred for the construction of water systems and the proportion which was incurred for construction of sewage
disposal systems. The governing board shall send a certified copy of the determination to the Local Government Commission in order that the Commission and the governing body of the merged municipality can determine the net debt
of the merged municipality as required by

G.S. 159-55

.

History.
1989, c. 194, s. 1; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), 6.1.

Re-recodification; Technical and Conforming Changes.

Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, provides, in part: “The Revisor of Statutes shall recodify Chapter 138A of the General Statutes, Chapter 120C of the General Statutes, as well as Chapter 163 of the General Statutes, as amended by this act, into a new Chapter
163A of the General Statutes to be entitled ‘Elections and Ethics Enforcement Act,’ as enacted by Section 4 of this act. The Revisor may also recodify into the new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes other existing statutory laws
relating to elections and ethics enforcement that are located elsewhere in the General Statutes as the Revisor deems appropriate.” The Revisor was further authorized to make additional technical and conforming changes to catchlines,
internal citations, and other references throughout the General Statutes to effectuate this recodification. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor of Statutes substituted “G.S. 163A-769(8)” for “G.S. 163-33(8)” in subdivision (4).

Session Laws 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), and 6.1 repealed Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, and authorized the Revisor of Statutes to re-recodify Chapter 163A into Chapters 163, 138A, and 120C and to revert the changes made by the Revisor pursuant to Session
Laws 2017-6, s. 3. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor of Statutes reverted the changes to references in subdivision (4).